Utah statutes.
70A-2-606.   What constitutes acceptance of goods.



(1)  Acceptance of goods occurs when the buyer

(a)  after a reasonable opportunity to inspect the goods signifies to the seller that the goods are conforming or that he will take or retain them in spite of their nonconformity; or

(b)  fails to make an effective rejection (Subsection (1) of Section 70A-2-602), but such acceptance does not occur until the buyer has had a reasonable opportunity to inspect them; or

(c)  does any act inconsistent with the seller's ownership; but if such act is wrongful as against the seller it is an acceptance only if ratified by him.

(2)  Acceptance of a part of any commercial unit is acceptance of that entire unit.

